Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-315
Wells and pitfalls; violation; penalty.

Any person who violates section 54-311 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1897, c. 6, § 4, p. 47;

R.S.1913, § 108;

C.S.1922, § 116;

C.S.1929, § 54-313;

R.S.1943, § 54-315;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 10.